Hawaii statutes.
§414D-184 Restated, amended and restated,
articles of incorporation. (a) A corporation's board of directors may
restate its articles of incorporation at any time with or without approval by
members or any other person.

(b) If the restatement includes an amendment
requiring approval by members, the board must submit the restatement to the
members for their approval.

(c) If the board seeks to have the restatement
approved by the members at a membership meeting, the corporation shall notify
each of its members of the proposed membership meeting in accordance with
section 414D‑105. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one
of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and
contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the restatement.

(d) If the board seeks to have the restatement
approved by the members by ballot or written consent, the material soliciting
the approval shall contain or be accompanied by a copy or summary of the
restatement.

(e) A restatement requiring approval by the
members must be approved by the same vote as an amendment to articles under
section 414D‑182.

(f) A corporation restating its articles shall
deliver to the department director articles of restatement setting forth the
name of the corporation and the text of the restated articles of incorporation
together with a statement that the restatement of incorporation correctly sets
forth without change the corresponding provisions of the articles of
incorporation as theretofore amended and that the restated articles of
incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and any
amendments thereto.

(g) Duly adopted restated articles of
incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and all
amendments to them.

(h) The department director may certify
restated articles of incorporation, as the articles of incorporation currently
in effect, without including the information required by subsection (f).

(i) A domestic corporation may at any time
amend and restate its articles of incorporation by complying with the
procedures and requirements of this part.

(j) Upon its adoption, the amended and
restated articles of incorporation shall set forth:

(1) All of the operative provisions of the articles
of incorporation as theretofore amended;

(2) The information required by section 414D‑183;
and

(3) A statement that the amended and restated
articles of incorporation supersede the original articles of incorporation and
all amendments thereto.

(k) The amended and restated articles of
incorporation shall be delivered to the director for filing together with a
statement setting forth:

(1) Whether the restatement contains an amendment to
the articles requiring member approval and, if it does not, that the board of
directors adopted the restatement; or

(2) If the restatement contains an amendment to the
articles requiring member approval, the information required by section
414D-183. The department director may certify the amended and restated
articles of incorporation as the articles of incorporation currently in effect,
without including the information required to be filed by subsection (j)(2) and
(3). [L 2001, c 105, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 124, §29; am L 2011, c 37, §13]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next